California, session 20252026, AB89.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33353.8 is added to the Education Code, to read:33353.8. Notwithstanding any other law, the California Interscholastic Federation shall amend its constitution, bylaws, and policies to prohibit a pupil whose sex was assigned male at birth from participating on a girls’ interscholastic sports team.